examples/patterns/hyph-de-1996-compound.pat.txt
zirr4
3zirz
zis4
ziss2
zi1sz
zit2h
zit4t
ziv2
zi1ve
zi1z
z1j
2z1k2
zkampf4
zkampfflug8
zkon4
2z1l2
z2lar
zlauf8zeitm
z3led
z3leh
z3lein
z3leis
zler3w
zle1t
zlig1k
z2li3p
z2lu
z3luf
z2ly
2z3m
z6marktf
2z1n2
z2ne
znei1
z3nel
z3neu
znieder6
2zo.
z1ob
2zo1d
zo2e
2z1of
zo2g
4zogenb
4zogenr
2zogi
2zogl
2zogs.
2zogsm
2zogsw
2zogtu
2zogtü
z1oh
zo1k
1zol4
2zol.
2zola
zo1m
zonal2
5zonen.
zon3s
zoo3f
zoo3t
2z1ope
zo3pi
z1or2
2zo1s2
z1öf
1zög
8zögerungs
zög3l
z1öls
z5ölverb
2zön
2z1p
z2pas
z3pass.
zper2
z3pr
zprogrammier8
z6punktf
z1q
2z1r2
zre2
zricht4
zrück2
4z1s2
z3sa
z8schlusss
zse2
zsichtig8
zspiel8warenb
zsteuer8a
2zt
z1ta
z4tagsg
z2t1au
z1tä
z3tee
zte1g
z1tei
z4teilp
zte1ma
z1temp
z1term
z1teu
zt1h
z1ther
zt3hu
zthub2
z1to2
ztopo2
z1tö
z1tr
ztrans4
zt1rec
zt2ru
zt3s2
zt1t
z1tu
z3tü
zt1z
1zu
zu1al
zu1an
zub2
zu4bal
zu1bel
zu2bet
3zubl
zu2bo
zu2brü
zu3bu
3zu2c
zuch2
zuck4
zud4
zu2do
zu3du
zu2el
zuer2
2zu1erf
zu1erh
zuf4
zufällig7k
zu6fe
zu2fer
zu1fi
zu1fl
zu4fors
zu3fro
4zufügs
4zufügt
4zufügu
zu1g
zug1ar
3zugä
3zugeb
4zugebt
2zugek
4zugen
2zuger
3zugest
3zugl
3zu2gr
zugs1
4zugsa
4zugsb
4zugsd
2zugse
4zugsg
2zugsk
4zugsl
4zugsm
4zugso
4zugss
2zugsv
4zugsw
2zugt
zug1un
3zuh
zu2han
zu2har
zu4her
zu2hil
zu2höh
4z1uhr
zu1in
zu2ja
zu2kal
2zukam
zu1ke
zu2ken
zu1kle
zu2kos
zu2kö
zu2kr
zu3kra
zu2ku
3zula
5zulä
zu4läd
zu1ler
3zum2
4z1um.
zu1ma
zumen2
z1umf
z1umg
z1uml
zu2mo
4z1umr
z1ums
zu1mu
zu2mü
2zun2
3zunä
3zune
3zunf
zungsricht8
3zu1ni
z1unt
zunter4
zu2p
zu4pf
zu3pi
zur2a
zu1ram
zu1ran
zu1ras
zu1rat
7zurei
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urs
z1urt
zu1rüs
3zus2
zu2sam
zu1san
zu1si
zu3spr
zu2sta
zu2stä
zu4stu
zu3stü
zut2
zu4tau
zu2ti
zu3tie
zu1tr
zu3trö
zu1tu
zu1u
zu2vo
zu4was
zu2wet
zuz2
3zu2zäu
zu2ze
2zu3zu
1zü2
2züb
züber6
züchtig7k
2zügeg
2zügep
8zündungs
2z1v
zver4
zvor6
1zw2
z1wac
z1wal
zwand3e
zwander6
8zwanzigj
z1war
2z1was
4zweckf
4zweckw
2z1weg
2z1weh
2zweib
8zweiflungs
2zweis
3zweist
z3weiß
zwei1z
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
z1wes
zwider4
zwie1g
z1wil
8zwingungs
2zwir
z8wirtschaftl
7zwischen.
z1wiss
2z1wo
z1wör
2zwü
3zy2
4zy.
4zym3
z1z
zz4a
z3zei
z6zeitpa
zzer2
z3zet
zzi3s
zz2o
z3zu
zzu2f
zzu2g
z2zügl
z3zw
